Alabama, session 2026rs, SB372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) SOLAR POWER FACILITY. A large-scale, ground-mounted
installation of photovoltaic panels that are designed to
generate electricity using solar power for use off-site or for
sale to a third party, including all equipment and facilities
required to operate the facility and transmit generated
electricity.
(2) UNDER CONSTRUCTION. Means construction has begun as
provided by I.R.S. Notice 2025-42.
(b) For one year after the effective date of this act,
Page 1

(b) For one year after the effective date of this act,
SB372 INTRODUCED
a solar power facility not operating or under construction on
the effective date of this act may not be constructed or
operated.
(c) This section shall only apply to the unincorporated
area of any county served by the Tennessee Valley Authority
due to the authority's distinctive regulatory authority and
transmission and distribution infrastructure.
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 2